src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
!  --------------------
!! The Low German language adjectives compare.

LEXICON A_sk
+A: #; ! Hölp!
+A:e #; ! Hölp!
+A+Pl:en #; ! Hölp!


LEXICON Comparisons
+A+Pos:0        Cases   ;
+A+Cmp:er       Cases   ;
+A+Sup:est      Cases   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
